Illinois, session 104th, HB4680.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 212 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/212)7    Sec. 212. Earned income tax credit. 8    (a) With respect to the federal earned income tax credit 9allowed for the taxable year under Section 32 of the federal 10Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 32, each individual taxpayer 11is entitled to a credit against the tax imposed by subsections 12(a) and (b) of Section 201 in an amount equal to (i) 5% of the 13federal tax credit for each taxable year beginning on or after 14January 1, 2000 and ending prior to December 31, 2012, (ii) 157.5% of the federal tax credit for each taxable year beginning 16on or after January 1, 2012 and ending prior to December 31, 172013, (iii) 10% of the federal tax credit for each taxable year 18beginning on or after January 1, 2013 and beginning prior to 19January 1, 2017, (iv) 14% of the federal tax credit for each 20taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2017 and 21beginning prior to January 1, 2018, (v) 18% of the federal tax 22credit for each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 232018 and beginning prior to January 1, 2023, and (vi) 20% of   HB4680- 2 -LRB104 19070 HLH 32515 b1the federal tax credit for each taxable year beginning on or 2after January 1, 2023 and beginning before January 1, 2026, 3and (vii) 30% of the federal tax credit for each taxable year 4beginning on or after January 1, 2026. 5    For a non-resident or part-year resident, the amount of 6the credit under this Section shall be in proportion to the 7amount of income attributable to this State. 8    (b) For taxable years beginning before January 1, 2003, in 9no event shall a credit under this Section reduce the 10taxpayer's liability to less than zero. For each taxable year 11beginning on or after January 1, 2003, if the amount of the 12credit exceeds the income tax liability for the applicable tax 13year, then the excess credit shall be refunded to the 14taxpayer. The amount of a refund shall not be included in the 15taxpayer's income or resources for the purposes of determining 16eligibility or benefit level in any means-tested benefit 17program administered by a governmental entity unless required 18by federal law. 19    (b-5) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 202023, each individual taxpayer who has attained the age of 18 21during the taxable year but has not yet attained the age of 25 22is entitled to the credit under paragraph (a) based on the 23federal tax credit for which the taxpayer would have been 24eligible without regard to any age requirements that would 25otherwise apply to individuals without a qualifying child in 26Section 32(c)(1)(A)(ii) of the federal Internal Revenue Code.   HB4680- 3 -LRB104 19070 HLH 32515 b1    (b-10) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 22023, each individual taxpayer who has attained the age of 65 3or older during the taxable year is entitled to the credit 4under paragraph (a) based on the federal tax credit for which 5the taxpayer would have been eligible without regard to any 6age requirements that would otherwise apply to individuals 7without a qualifying child in Section 32(c)(1)(A)(ii) of the 8federal Internal Revenue Code. 9    (b-15) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 102023, each individual taxpayer filing a return using an 11individual taxpayer identification number (ITIN) as prescribed 12under Section 6109 of the Internal Revenue Code, other than a 13Social Security number issued pursuant to Section 205(c)(2)(A) 14of the Social Security Act, is entitled to the credit under 15paragraph (a) based on the federal tax credit for which they 16would have been eligible without applying the restrictions 17regarding social security numbers in Section 32(m) of the 18federal Internal Revenue Code. 19    (c) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 20250. 21(Source: P.A. 102-700, eff. 4-19-22.) 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 23becoming law.